Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5175.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13c. (1) Beginning with bids received on or after January 1, 2026, subject to subsections (2) and (3), the department must, and a local road agency may, if undertaking a new construction or full reconstruction of a highway segment or bridge, obtain a contract that provides for a contractor to design, build, operate, preserve, and maintain the highway segment or bridge for not less than 10 years after the project is completed or until the first capital preventative maintenance treatment, whichever is later. The prime contractor on a contract described in this subsection is responsible for the work of any subcontractors for the life of that contract. (2) The standards required for the designing, building, operating, preserving, and maintaining of a highway segment or bridge under a contract described in subsection (1) may be negotiated between the department or local road agency and the contractor, including, but not limited to, what is considered general maintenance that is not the responsibility of the contractor. (3) A contract described in subsection (1) may provide for the financing of the project and must provide, at a minimum, for all of the following: (a) If the contractor breaches the contract, the department or local road agency may either withhold payments or renegotiate the terms of the contract with the contractor. (b) The lowest contract payment made during any 1 year of the contract term must be not less than 10% of the highest contract payment made during any 1 year of the contract term. (c) That the contractor is not responsible for repairing damage to a highway segment or bridge that is caused by a disaster that results in a state of emergency being declared by the state or county. (4) As used in this section: (a) "Disaster" means an occurrence or threat of widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property resulting from a natural or human-made cause, including, but not limited to, fire, flood, snowstorm, ice storm, tornado, windstorm, wave action, oil spill, water contamination, utility failure, hazardous peacetime radiological incident, major transportation accident, hazardous materials incident, epidemic, air contamination, blight, drought, infestation, explosion, or hostile military action or paramilitary action, or similar occurrences resulting from terrorist activities, riots, or civil disorders. (b) "General maintenance" means preventive care as determined by contracting, and may include, but is not limited to, chip sealing, pothole repair, snow plowing, removing animals, installing cable and barrier guards, and applying sand and salt. (c) "Local road agency" means that term as defined in section 9a. (d) "New construction or full reconstruction" includes, but is not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (i) Reconstruction. (ii) Rehabilitation. (iii) Widening of less than the width of 1 lane. (iv) Adding auxiliary weaving, climbing, or speed change lanes. (e) "Operate" does not include operating tolling on a highway segment or bridge. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5176 (request no. H00856'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.